tests/infixes01.aff
# infixes (see manual)

# Indonesian: perintah (rule) -> pemerintah (government)
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 .em .


# Hungarian: kerék (wheel) -> kerekek (wheels)
# szerelem (love) -> szerelmek (loves)
# bagoly (owl) -> baglyok (owls)
SFX B Y 5
SFX B é. eke. .
SFX B é. e.ek .
SFX B e. et .
SFX B e. ek .
SFX B o.. ok .

SFX D Y 1
SFX D é. eke. .
