tests/infixes01.dic
6
perintah/A	rule (Indonesian)
getar/A	vibration (Indonesian)
kerék/D		wheel (Hungarian)
cserép/D	tile (Hungarian)
szerelem/B	love (Hungarian)
lepel/B	shroud (Hungarian)
bagoly/B	owl (Hungarian)
torony/B	tower (Hungarian)
